Utah statutes.
73-18-20.   Enforcement of chapter -- Authority to stop and board vessels -- Disregarding law enforcement signal to stop as misdemeanor -- Procedure for arrest.

(1)  Any law enforcement officer authorized under Title 53, Chapter 13, Peace Officer Classifications, may enforce the provisions of this chapter and the rules promulgated under this chapter.

(2)  Any law enforcement officer authorized under Title 53, Chapter 13, Peace Officer Classifications, has the authority to stop and board any vessel subject to this chapter, whether the vessel is on water or land.  If that officer determines the vessel is overloaded, unseaworthy, or the safety equipment required by this chapter or rules of the board is not on the vessel, that officer may prohibit the launching of the vessel or stop the vessel from operating.

(3)  An operator who, having received a visual or audible signal from a law enforcement officer authorized under Title 53, Chapter 13, Peace Officer Classifications, to bring his vessel to a stop, operates his vessel in willful or wanton disregard of the signal so as to interfere with or endanger the operation of any vessel or endanger any person, or who attempts to flee or elude the officer whether by vessel or otherwise is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

(4)  Whenever any person is arrested for any violation of the provisions of this chapter or of the rules promulgated under this chapter, the procedure for arrest is the same as outlined in Sections 77-7-22 through 77-7-24.



Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

